District of Columbia statutes.
50-610

Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or the application of this chapter which can be effected without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

Apr. 22, 1960, 74 Stat. 73, Pub. L. 86-431, § 11
1981 Ed., § 40-1110.
1973 Ed., § 40-910.